incubator/apertium-ovd.ovd.dix
<pardef n="/åvå__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>åvå</l>   <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>har</l>    <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>har</l>    <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>har</l>    <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>amm</l>   <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avið</l>  <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åvå</l>   <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>adde</l>  <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adde</l>  <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adde</l>  <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>addum</l> <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>addið</l> <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adde</l>  <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>avi</l>   <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avið</l>  <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>avend</l> <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>apt</l>   <r>åvå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dalsk/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>   <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>   <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ið</l>  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>   <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðum</l> <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðið</l> <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>   <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ið</l>  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>end</l> <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>að</l>   <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="spil/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>är</l>    <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ið</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>äð</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åðum</l> <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äðið</l> <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äð</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ið</l>  <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>end</l> <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äð</l>   <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kw/eðå__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eðå</l>   <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>    <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðum</l>   <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðið</l>  <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðå</l>   <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>að</l>  <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aðum</l> <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aðið</l> <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aðu</l>  <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>   <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðið</l>  <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eðend</l> <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eðið</l>   <r>eðå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- TODO verbs (anything assigned to these is probably wrong): -->
<pardef n="b/åkå__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>åkå</l>      <r>åkå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äkär</l>      <r>åkå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/ą̊__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ą̊</l>      <r>ą̊<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą̊r</l>      <r>ą̊<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inggum</l>      <r>ą̊<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkum</l>      <r>ą̊<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="wil__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kuog/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>      <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e> <!-- p1.sg ? -->
  <e>       <p><l>ið</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="akudir/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>     <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e> <!-- p1.sg ? -->
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e> <!-- p1.sg ? -->
</pardef>


<!-- Nouns:

m/f/nt
sg/pl
nom/acc/dat/gen (gen is not productive, just -es suffix to dat)
ind/def

weak vs strong
long vs short (root vowel)

acc/dat may be verb-governed

«attributive adj's often form a compound with the noun they determine,
e.g. sturkull/stur+kulla» – note the apocope is compound-only-R

-->

<e lm="wil"> <i>wil</i> <par n="wil__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="åvå"> <i></i> <par n="/åvå__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fą̊"> <i>f</i> <par n="f/ą̊__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fårå"> <i>får</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kåytå"> <i>kåyt</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dalska" c="snakka elvdalsk"> <i>dalsk</i> <par n="dalsk/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swenska" c="snakka svensk"> <i>swensk</i> <par n="dalsk/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spilå"> <i>spil</i> <par n="spil/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kweðå" c="synga"> <i>kw</i> <par n="kw/eðå__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="båkå"> <i>b</i> <par n="b/åkå__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kuogå"> <i>kuog</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tyttjå"> <i>tyttj</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föstå"> <i>föst</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stiälå"> <i>stiäl</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="djävå"> <i>djäv</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="witå"> <i>wit</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leså"> <i>les</i> <par n="kuog/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="akudira"> <i>akudir</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="węsa" c="pusta"> <i>węs</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ära"> <i>är</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="byddja"> <i>byddj</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="söma"> <i>söm</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="biuoða" c="by"> <i>biuoð</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="myöta"> <i>myöt</i> <par n="akudir/a__vblex"/></e>
